Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-240
Additional appropriation; conditions; application procedure.

Whenever any person shall desire to divert any of the unappropriated waters of any natural lake or reservoir, or any person shall desire to recover any unappropriated water intentionally stored underground, for irrigation or any other beneficial purpose, for which water has already been appropriated, but for which in times of scarcity no water can be obtained from the appropriation already made therefor, such person may make application therefor and proceed as in cases of original application for appropriation.

An application for recovery of water intentionally stored underground may be made only by an appropriator of record who shows, by documentary evidence, sufficient interest in the underground water storage facility to entitle the applicant to the water requested.

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. VII, art. V, div. 2, § 28, p. 845;

C.S.1922, § 8447;

C.S.1929, § 81-6328;

R.S.1943, § 46-240;

Laws 1983, LB 198, § 8;

Laws 1985, LB 488, § 4.